Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1208
Other laws; applicability of sections.

Any standards relating to minimum wage, maximum hours, or other working conditions in effect on October 23, 1967, by or under any other law of this state, which are more favorable to employees than those applicable to such employees under the provisions of sections 48-1201 to 48-1209, shall not be deemed to be amended, rescinded, or otherwise affected by sections 48-1201 to 48-1209 but shall continue in full force and effect.

Laws 1967, c. 285, § 8, p. 776.